Washington statutes.
RCW 43.20.265

Elevated lead level—Definition.

After July 1, 2030, the state board may, by rule, define "elevated lead level" at a concentration of five or fewer parts per billion if scientific evidence supports a lower concentration as having the potential for further reducing the health effects of lead contamination in drinking water.

[ 2021 c 154 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2021 c 154: See notes following RCW 43.70.830.